Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.100

Bankruptcy, readjustment and relief from debts.

A code city may exercise the powers and obtain the benefits relating to bankruptcy, readjustment and relief from debts as authorized by chapter 39.64 RCW in accordance with the procedures therein prescribed.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.40.100.]